Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.175

Recovery of payments to recipients of state money—Basis—Resolution of audit findings—Rules.

The superintendent of public instruction shall withhold or recover state payments to school districts, educational service districts, and other recipients of state money based on findings of the Washington state auditor. When an audit questions enrollment, staffing, or other data reported to the state and used in state apportionment calculations, the superintendent of public instruction may require submission of revised data, or as an alternative may adjust data based on estimates, and shall revise apportionment calculations and payments accordingly. The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules setting forth policies and procedures for the resolution of monetary and nonmonetary audit findings involving state money.

[ 1997 c 167 s 1.]